Utah statutes.
11-13-212.   Contracts between public agencies or with interlocal entities to perform services, activities, or undertakings -- Facilities and improvements.

(1) (a)  Public agencies may contract with each other and one or more public agencies may contract with an interlocal entity created under this chapter to perform any service, activity, or undertaking which each public agency entering into the contract is authorized by law to perform.

(b)  Each contract under Subsection (1)(a) shall be authorized as provided in Section 11-13-202.5.

(c)  Each contract under Subsection (1)(a) shall set forth fully the purposes, powers, rights, objectives, and responsibilities of the contracting parties.

(d)  In order to perform a service, activity, or undertaking provided for in a contract under Subsection (1)(a), a public agency may create, construct, or otherwise acquire facilities or improvements in excess of those required to meet the needs and requirements of the parties to the contract.

(2)  An interlocal entity created by agreement under this chapter may create, construct, or otherwise acquire facilities or improvements to render services or provide benefits in excess of those required to meet the needs or requirements of the public agencies that are parties to the agreement if it is determined by the public agencies to be necessary to accomplish the purposes and realize the benefits set forth in Section 11-13-102.

